Nebraska, session 109, LB503.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(b) Electric energy storage resource means a resource capable of
receiving electric energy from the electrical grid, or from the
generation source with which it is associated, and storing it for later
injection of electric energy into the electrical grid. Electric energy
storage resource does not include devices or equipment intended solely to
inject or absorb reactive power, such as capacitors and synchronous
condensers, or equipment intended solely to provide power for electric
vehicles;
(c) Privately developed renewable energy generation facility has the
same meaning as in section 70-1001.01 and also includes any electric
energy storage resource;
(d) Solar energy system has the same meaning as in section 66-905;
and
(e) Wind energy conversion system has the same meaning as in section
66-909.02.
(2) To support rural economic development, broaden the local tax
base, and reduce residents' property taxes, each county in this state
shall have the option to become an American energy friendly county in
exchange for additional local tax revenue from the owners of privately
developed renewable energy generation facilities.
(3) A county board that determines to pursue designation as an
American energy friendly county shall, by resolution, state the county's
intention to either:
(a) Apply to the department for an American energy friendly county
designation; or
(b) Submit the question of whether to apply for an American energy
friendly county designation to a vote of the registered voters of the
county.
(4)(a) If the county board adopts a resolution pursuant to
-2-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
subdivision (3)(b) of this section, the question may be submitted to the
voters at a special election or such question may be voted on at an
election held in conjunction with the statewide primary or statewide
general election.
(b) The resolution ordering the submission of the question to the
registered voters of the county shall contain the entire wording of the
ballot question, which shall state the question as follows: "Shall the
county of [name of the county] apply for an American energy friendly
county designation?".
(c) The county shall file a copy of the resolution with the election
commissioner or county clerk not later than the eighth Friday prior to a
special election that is not held in conjunction with the statewide
primary or general election, or not later than March 1 prior to a
statewide primary election or September 1 prior to a statewide general
election. The election shall be conducted in accordance with the Election
Act.
(5) If the resolution states the county's intention to apply for an
American energy friendly county designation pursuant to subdivision (3)
(a) of this section, or if a majority of those voting on the issue
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section vote in favor of the question,
the county board shall delegate authority for the county zoning
administrator or other authorized individual to apply on the county's
behalf. The county zoning administrator or other authorized individual
shall then apply to the department on a form prescribed by the
department. If the county meets the requirements of this section, the
department shall, within thirty days after receiving the application,
designate the county as an American energy friendly county and inform the
county board of such designation by written notice. The department shall
maintain a current and accurate list on its website of:
(a) The counties that have applied for an American energy friendly
county designation;
-3-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
(b) The counties that have received an American energy friendly
county designation; and
(c) The total nameplate capacity tax levied under subsection (8) of
this section that each American energy friendly county has generated
annually during its designation.
(6) If after designation as an American energy friendly county a
county no longer meets the requirements of this section, such county
shall lose its American energy friendly county designation if it does not
cure the noncompliance within thirty days after receipt of written notice
from the department.
(7) To qualify for an American energy friendly county designation, a
county's regulations, including its zoning regulations, shall comply with
the following:
(a) The county shall permit privately developed renewable energy
generation facilities by right in all zoning areas that allow structures
of any type by right. The county shall not require a variance,
conditional use permit, special use permit, special permit, or other
discretionary zoning approval for the installation or operation of
privately developed renewable energy generation facilities. The county
may require the owner or installer of a privately developed renewable
energy generation facility to (i) apply for a building or zoning permit
for the facility, approval of which shall be ministerial and not
discretionary, (ii) submit the plans and specifications for the facility,
along with the stamped approval of an engineer licensed in Nebraska,
(iii) provide evidence, in the form of a certificate of insurance
reasonably satisfactory to the county, showing general liability
insurance coverage for the installation and operation of the facility,
and (iv) comply with the county's generally applicable zoning
regulations, if such regulations are consistent with this section;
(b) The county shall not require sound from privately developed
renewable energy generation facilities to be quieter, at any time, than
-4-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
fifty decibels for a ten-minute average measured at any occupied
nonparticipating dwelling unit using the "A" scale at a ten-minute
continuous equivalent sound level over a twenty-four-hour period. The
county shall recognize a waiver of its sound restriction, if any, to the
extent the impacted landowner has executed a written waiver of the same;
(c)(i) The county shall not require setbacks to or from privately
developed renewable energy generation facilities, except that:
(A) The county may require a setback from nonparticipating
landowners' occupied dwelling units that is up to (I) three times a wind
turbine's total height for any wind turbine within a wind energy
conversion system and (II) three hundred feet for any solar energy system
or other form of privately developed renewable energy generation
facility; and
(B) The county may also require a setback from nonparticipating
landowners' property lines or public rights-of-way that is up to (I) one
and one-tenth times a wind turbine's total height for any wind turbine
within a wind energy conversion system and (II) one hundred feet for any
solar energy system or other form of privately developed renewable energy
generation facility.
(ii) The county shall measure such setbacks, if any, from the base
of the nearest wind turbine, solar panel, or other privately developed
renewable energy generation facility. The county shall recognize a waiver
of its setback distance, if any, to the extent the impacted landowner has
executed a written waiver of such setback distance;
(d) The county shall not impose a height limitation on any component
within a privately developed renewable energy generation facility;
(e) The county shall not require buffers or otherwise regulate the
visibility of privately developed renewable energy generation facilities,
except that the county may require screening of solar energy systems from
the view of surrounding streets and roads by garden walls, fences,
hedges, landscaping, or other means so long as such screening is
-5-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
economically practicable for the system owner and would still afford
effective solar access on the lot in question. The county shall recognize
a waiver of its screening requirement, if any, to the extent the impacted
neighboring landowner has executed a written waiver of such screening
requirement; and
(f) The county shall impose no additional decommissioning
requirements for privately developed renewable energy generation
facilities beyond those required in subdivision (2)(a)(iii) of section
70-1014.02.
(8) The owner of a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility that commences commercial operation in an American energy
friendly county shall, so long as such facility continues commercial
operation in an American energy friendly county, pay a nameplate capacity
tax at one and one-half times the rate set for other privately developed
renewable energy generation facilities in subdivision (1)(a) of section
77-6203.
(9) The American Energy Friendly Counties Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the department and shall be used to award grants
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section to help qualifying counties
become American energy friendly counties. The fund shall consist of money
transferred by the Legislature and gifts, grants, or bequests from any
source, including money remitted to the fund from any other federal,
state, public, and private sources. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(10) The department shall create and administer a grant program to
reimburse eligible expenses that qualifying counties incur in becoming
American energy friendly counties. Eligible expenses include fees for
consultants and attorneys to assist with revising the county's
regulations to conform to this section. Eligible expenses do not include
-6-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
incentive payments to owners or installers of privately developed
renewable energy generation facilities.
(11) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out this section.
Sec. 2. Section 77-6203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6203 (1) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility
annually shall pay (a) a nameplate capacity tax equal to the total
nameplate capacity of the commissioned renewable energy generation
facility multiplied by a tax rate of three thousand five hundred eighteen
dollars per megawatt or (b) the nameplate capacity tax described in
subsection (8) of section 1 of this act, whichever is applicable.
(2) No tax shall be imposed on a renewable energy generation
facility:
(a) Owned or operated by the federal government, the State of
Nebraska, a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an individual municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric membership association, or a cooperative; or
(b) That is a customer-generator as defined in section 70-2002.
(3) No tax levied pursuant to this section shall be construed to
constitute restricted funds as defined in section 13-518 for the first
five years after the renewable energy generation facility is
commissioned.
(4) The presence of one or more renewable energy generation
facilities or supporting infrastructure shall not be a factor in the
assessment, determination of actual value, or classification under
section 77-201 of the real property underlying or adjacent to such
facilities or infrastructure.
(5)(a) The Department of Revenue shall collect the tax due under
this section.
(b) The tax shall be imposed beginning the first calendar year the
-7-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
renewable energy generation facility is commissioned. A renewable energy
generation facility that uses wind as the fuel source which was
commissioned prior to July 15, 2010, shall be subject to the tax levied
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 on and after January 1, 2010. The
amount of property tax on depreciable tangible personal property
previously paid on a renewable energy generation facility that uses wind
as the fuel source which was commissioned prior to July 15, 2010, which
is greater than the amount that would have been paid pursuant to sections
77-6201 to 77-6204 from the date of commissioning until January 1, 2010,
shall be credited against any tax due under Chapter 77, and any amount so
credited that is unused in any tax year shall be carried over to
subsequent tax years until fully utilized.
(c)(i) The tax for the first calendar year shall be prorated based
upon the number of days remaining in the calendar year after the
renewable energy generation facility is commissioned.
(ii) In the first year in which a renewable energy generation
facility is taxed or in any year in which additional commissioned
nameplate capacity is added to a renewable energy generation facility,
the taxes on the initial or additional nameplate capacity shall be
prorated for the number of days remaining in the calendar year.
(iii) When a renewable energy generation facility is decommissioned
or made nonoperational by a change in law during a tax year, the taxes
shall be prorated for the number of days during which the renewable
energy generation facility was not decommissioned or was operational.
(iv) When the capacity of a renewable energy generation facility to
produce electricity is reduced but the renewable energy generation
facility is not decommissioned, the nameplate capacity of the renewable
energy generation facility is deemed to be unchanged.
(v) In the first year in which a county gains or loses its
designation as an American energy friendly county, the increased
nameplate capacity tax under subsection (8) of section 1 of this act on
-8-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
owners of privately developed renewable energy generation facilities in
such county shall be prorated for the number of days the department
designated the county an American energy friendly county during such
year.
(6)(a) On March 1 of each year, the owner of a renewable energy
generation facility shall file with the Department of Revenue a report on
the nameplate capacity of the facility for the previous year from January
1 through December 31. All taxes shall be due on April 1 and shall be
delinquent if not paid on a quarterly basis on April 1 and each quarter
thereafter. Delinquent quarterly payments shall draw interest at the rate
provided for in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted.
(b) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility is liable
for the taxes under this section with respect to the facility, whether or
not the owner of the facility is the owner of the land on which the
facility is situated.
(7) Failure to file a report required by subsection (6) of this
section, filing such report late, failure to pay taxes due, or
underpayment of such taxes shall result in a penalty of five percent of
the amount due being imposed for each quarter the report is overdue or
the payment is delinquent, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten
thousand dollars.
(8) The Department of Revenue shall enforce the provisions of this
section. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary for the implementation and enforcement of this section.
(9) The Department of Revenue shall separately identify the proceeds
from the tax imposed by this section and shall pay all such proceeds over
to the county treasurer of the county where the renewable energy
generation facility is located within thirty days after receipt of such
proceeds.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-6203, Revised Statutes Cumulative
-9-

LB503 LB503
2025 2025
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-10-